Washington statutes.
RCW 11.56.230

Sale or mortgage to effect redemption.

If it shall be made to appear to the satisfaction of the court that it will be to the interest of the estate of any deceased person to sell or mortgage other personal estate or to sell or mortgage other real estate of the decedent than that mortgaged by him or her to redeem the property so mortgaged, the court may order the sale or mortgaging of any personal estate, or the sale or mortgaging of any real estate of the decedent which it may deem expedient to be sold or mortgaged for such purpose, which sale or mortgaging shall be conducted in all respects as other sales or mortgages of like property ordered by the court.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2051; 1965 c 145 s 11.56.230. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 144; RRS s 1514; prior: 1895 c 157 s 11; 1888 p 185 s 1.]